North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 106-735.
Short title, purpose, and administration.

This Article shall be known as “The Agricultural Development and Farmland Preservation Enabling Act.”

The purpose of this Article is to authorize counties and cities to undertake a series of programs to encourage the preservation of qualifying farmland, as defined herein, and to foster the growth, development, and sustainability of family farms.

This Article shall be administered and supervised by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 2, 9; 2011-251, s. 1.

§ 106-736.
Agricultural Development/Farmland preservation programs authorized.

A county or a city may by ordinance establish a farmland preservation program under this Article. The ordinance may authorize qualifying farms, as defined in

G.S. 106-737

, to take advantage of one or more of the benefits authorized by the remaining sections of this Article.

A county or a city may develop programs to promote the growth, development, and sustainability of farming and assist farmers in developing and implementing plans that achieve these goals. For purposes of this Article, the terms “agriculture”, “agricultural”, and “farming” have the same meaning as set forth in

G.S. 106-581.1

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 2, 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-390, s. 10, effective September 13, 2005, added “Agricultural Development” to the section heading; inserted “or a city” preceding “may by ordinance” in subsection (a); and added subsection (b).